Maryland, session 2025, HB0903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
14–3501.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0903*

HOUSE BILL 903
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Business” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation,
association, or any other business entity, whether or not organized to operate at a profit.
(2) “Business” includes a financial institution organized, chartered,
licensed, or otherwise authorized under the laws of this State, any other state, the United
States, or any other country, and the parent or subsidiary of a financial institution.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–428.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BUSINESS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–3501 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(3) “CLIMATE CHANGE” MEANS THE INCREASING CHANGES IN THE
MEASURES OF CLIMATE OVER A LONG PERIOD OF TIME, INCLUDING PRECIPITATION,
TEMPERATURE, AND WIND PATTERNS.
(4) “GLOBAL WARMING” MEANS THE RISE IN GLOBAL
TEMPERATURES DUE TO THE INCREASING CONCENTRATIONS OF GREENHOUSE
GASES IN THE ATMOSPHERE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT:
(1) PROHIBIT THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT FROM ENFORCING HEALTH, ENVIRONMENTAL, ZONING, OR ANY
OTHER APPLICABLE LAW; OR
(2) RELIEVE A BUSINESS FROM THE RESPONSIBILITY OF COMPLYING
WITH THE TERMS OF ANY APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW.
(C) THE STATE OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OR AN AGENCY OF THE STATE
OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, MAY NOT FILE AN ACTION FOR MONETARY DAMAGES OR
ALLEGED ECONOMIC DAMAGES AGAINST A BUSINESS FOR THE ADVERSE EFFECTS OF
GLOBAL WARMING OR CLIMATE CHANGE IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.